Wisconsin, session 2025, AB343.
do enact as follows:AB343,11Section 1. 20.255 (2) (da) of the statutes is amended to read:AB343,2,5220.255 (2) (da) Aid for school mental Mental health programs and pupil 3wellness aid. The amounts in the schedule for aid to school districts and 4independent charter schools employ, hire, and retain pupil services professionals 5under s. 115.364.AB343,26Section 2. 115.364 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB343,2,87115.364 (title) Aid for school mental Mental health programs and 8pupil wellness aid.AB343,39Section 3. 115.364 (1) (intro.) of the statutes is renumbered 115.364 (1) and 10amended to read:AB343,2,1211115.364 (1) In this section:, “pupil services professional” means a school 12counselor, school social worker, school psychologist, or school nurse.AB343,413Section 4. 115.364 (1) (a), (am) and (b) of the statutes are repealed.AB343,51Section 5. 115.364 (2) (a) (intro.) and 1. of the statutes are consolidated, 2renumbered 115.364 (2) (a) and amended to read:AB343,3,133115.364 (2) (a) Beginning in the 2018-19 2026-27 school year and annually 4thereafter, the state superintendent shall do all of the following: 1. Subject, subject 5to par. (b), from the appropriation under s. 20.255 (2) (da), pay to an eligible 6reimburse a school district board, the operator of a charter school established under 7s. 118.40 (2r) or (2x), or the governing body of a private school participating in a 8program under s. 118.60 or 119.23 for an amount equal to 50 percent of the amount 9by which the school district increased its expenditures made by the school board, 10operator, or governing body in the preceding school year to employ, hire, or retain 11social workers over the amount it expended in the school year immediately 12preceding the preceding school year to employ, hire, or retain social workers pupil 13services professionals.AB343,614Section 6. 115.364 (2) (a) 2. and 3. of the statutes are repealed.AB343,715Section 7. 115.364 (2) (b) 1. of the statutes is renumbered 115.364 (2) (b) and 16amended to read:AB343,3,2217115.364 (2) (b) If the appropriation under s. 20.255 (2) (da) in any fiscal year 18is insufficient to pay the full amount of aid under par. (a), the state superintendent 19shall prorate state aid payments among the school districts, private schools, and 20independent charter schools boards, operators of charter schools established under 21s. 118.40 (2r) and (2x), and governing bodies of private schools participating in 22programs under ss. 118.60 and 119.23 that are eligible for the aid.AB343,823Section 8. 115.364 (2) (b) 2. of the statutes is repealed.AB343,91Section 9. 118.40 (2r) (e) 2p. a. of the statutes is amended to read:AB343,4,72118.40 (2r) (e) 2p. a. Add the amounts appropriated in the current fiscal year 3under s. 20.255 (2), except s. 20.255 (2) (ac), (aw), (az), (bb), (da), (dj), (du), (fm), (fp), 4(fq), (fr), (fu), (k), and (m); and s. 20.505 (4) (es); and the amount, as determined by 5the secretary of administration, of the appropriation under s. 20.505 (4) (s) 6allocated for payments to telecommunications providers under contracts with 7school districts and cooperative educational service agencies under s. 16.971 (13).AB343,108Section 10. Fiscal changes.AB343,4,159(1) Mental health and pupil wellness aid. In the schedule under s. 20.005 10(3) for the appropriation to the department of public instruction under s. 20.255 (2) 11(da), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by $16,500,000 for the 12purposes for which the appropriation is made. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) 13for the appropriation to the department of public instruction under s. 20.255 (2) 14(da), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by $18,000,000 for the 15purposes for which the appropriation is made.AB343,1116Section 11. Effective date.AB343,4,1817(1) This act takes effect on the day after publication, or on the 2nd day after 18publication of the 2025 biennial budget act, whichever is later.AB343,4,1919